incubator/apertium-sjo/apertium-sjo.sjo.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%>                 ! Noun
%<v%>                 ! Verb
%<post%>              ! Postposition
%<num%>               ! Numeral
%<prn%>               ! Pronoun
%<adj%>               ! Adjective
%<adv%>               ! Adverb

%<ord%>               ! Ordinal

%<advl%>

%<sent%>              ! End of sentence marker
%<cm%>                ! Comma

%<iv%>
%<tv%>
%<td%>
%<neg%>
%<ger1%>
%<ger2%>
%<ger3%>

%>                    ! Morpheme boundary
%+                    ! Word boundary
%                     ! Space

%{H%}
%{A%}

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 
Numerals ;
Adverbs ; 
Adjectives ;
Verbs ;
Pronouns ;
Postpositions ;
Punctuation ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

# ;                     ! Nominative
%+ᠪᡝ%<post%>:%>% ᠪᡝ # ; ! Accusative

LEXICON CASES-SEPARATE

CASES-COMMON ;
%+ᡳ%<post%>:%>% ᠨᡳ # ;    ! Genitive
%+ᡩᡝ%<post%>:%>% ᡩᡝ # ; ! Locative

LEXICON CASES-ATTACHED

CASES-COMMON ;
%+ᡳ%<post%>:%>ᠨᡳ # ;    ! Genitive
%+ᡩᡝ%<post%>:%>ᡩᡝ # ; ! Locative

LEXICON N1 

%<n%>: CASES-SEPARATE ; 

LEXICON N2

%<n%>: CASES-ATTACHED ;


LEXICON V-NEG

%<neg%>:%>ᡣᡡ # ;
# ;

LEXICON V-INFL

%<ger1%>:%>ᡫᡞ # ;
%<ger2%>:%>%{H%}%{A%} V-NEG ;
%<ger3%>:%>ᠮᡝ # ;
%<ger4%>:%>ᡵᡝ # ;

LEXICON CAUS

%<caus%>:ᠪᡠ V-INFL ;
V-INFL ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: CAUS ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL ;

LEXICON V-TD

%<v%>%<td%>: CAUS ;

LEXICON NUM 

%<num%>: # ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>ᠴᡞ # ;

LEXICON A1 

%<adj%>: # ;

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV1 

%<adv%>: # ; 

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Postpositions

ᠮᠠᡢᡤᡞ:ᠮᠠᡢᡤᡞ POST ; ! "after"


LEXICON Pronouns

ᠪᡞ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<nom%>:ᠪᡞ # ; ! "I"
ᠪᡞ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<gen%>:ᠮᡞᠨᡞ  # ; ! "my"
ᠪᡝ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<nom%>:ᠪᡝ # ; ! "we"
ᠪᡝ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<nom%>%+ᡳ%<post%>:ᠮᡝᠨᡞ # ; ! "us"
ᠰᡞ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<nom%>:ᠰᡞ # ; ! "you" (sg)
ᠰᡞ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<nom%>%+ᡳ%<post%>:ᠰᡞᠨᡞ # ; ! "you" (sg)

ᡨᡝᡵᡝ%<prn%>%<dem%>:ᡨᡝᡵᡝ CASES-ATTACHED ; ! "that"
ᡝᡵᡝ%<prn%>%<dem%>:ᡝᡵᡝ CASES-ATTACHED ; ! "this"
ᡞ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<gen%>:ᡞᠨᡠ # ; ! "his/her"

LEXICON Numerals

ᡝᠮᡠ:ᡝᠮᡠ NUM ; ! "one"
ᠨᠠᡩᠠ:ᠨᠠᡩᠠ NUM ; ! "seven"
ᡠᠶᡠᠨ:ᡠᠶᡠᠨ NUM ; ! "nine"

LEXICON Nouns 

ᠮᠣᡵᡞᠨ:ᠮᠣᡵᡞᠨ N1 ; ! "horse"
ᠰᡝᡪᡝᠨ:ᠰᡝᡪᡝᠨ N1 ; ! "cart"
ᠴᠣᠣᡥᠠ:ᠴᠣᠣᡥᠠ N2 ; ! "army, soldier"
ᡥᠠᡫᠠᠨ:ᡥᠠᡫᠠᠨ N1 ; ! "?"
ᡬᡞᠰᠣᠨ:ᡬᡞᠰᡠᠨ N1 ; ! "?"
ᡨᠣᡣᠰᠣ:ᡨᠣᡣᠰᠣ N1 ; ! "?"
ᡞᠨᡝᡢᡤᡞ:ᡞᠨᡝᡢᡤᡞ N1 ; ! "day"
ᡨᡠᠸᠠᡞ% ᠰᡝᡪᡝᠨ:ᡨᡠᠸᠠᡞ% ᠰᡝᡪᡝᠨ N1 ; ! "train"
ᠰᡠᡣᡩᡠᡪᡝᠨ:ᠰᡠᡣᡩᡠᡪᡝᠨ N1 ; ! "car"
ᡪᡠᡢᡣᡝᠨ:ᡪᡠᡢᡣᡝᠨ N1 ; ! "clock, bell"
ᠠᠪᡣᠠ:ᠠᠪᡣᠠ N1 ; ! "heaven"
ᠠᠮᠠ:ᠠᠮᠠ N1 ; ! "father"
ᡤᡠᡵᡠᠨ:ᡤᡠᡵᡠᠨ N1 ; ! "people"
ᡠᡵᠰᡝ:ᡠᡵᠰᡝ N2 ; ! "people"

LEXICON Adjectives

ᡧᠣᠯᠣ:ᡧᠣᠯᠣ A1 ; ! "free"
ᡝᡵᡩᡝ:ᡝᡵᡩᡝ A1 ; ! "early"
ᡪᠠᡞ:ᡪᠠᡞ A1 ; ! "next"

LEXICON Adverbs 

ᠰᡞᡩᡝᠨ:ᠰᡞᡩᡝᠨ ADV1 ; ! "for a while"
ᡝᡩᡝ:ᡝᡩᡝ ADV1 ; ! "here"
ᠠᠮᠪᡠᠯᠠ:ᠠᠮᠪᡠᠯᠠ ADV1 ; ! "seriously, greatly"

LEXICON Verbs

ᠪᠠ᠇ᡞ:ᠪᠠ᠇ᡞ V-IV ; ! "be"
ᡠᡵᡝᠪᡠ:ᡠᡵᡝᠪᡠ V-IV ; ! "drill" 
ᡞᠰᡞᠨᠠ:ᡞᠰᡞᠨᠠ V-IV ; ! "arrive"
ᡪᡞ:ᡪᡞ V-IV ; ! "come"
ᡪᡞᠯᡞᡩᠠ:ᡪᡞᠯᡞᡩᠠ V-IV ; ! "get angry"
ᡩᡠᠯᡝ:ᡩᡠᠯᡝ V-IV ; ! "strike"
ᠪᡠ:ᠪᡠ V-TV ; ! "give"
ᠠᡵᠠ:ᠠᡵᠠ V-TV ; ! "make"

ᡨᡠᠴᡞ:ᡥᠠᡫᠠᠨ V-TD ; ! ?
ᠠᠯᠠ:ᠠᠯᠠ V-TD ; ! ?
ᡝᡫᡠᡪᡝ:ᡝᡫᡠᡪᡝ V-TD ; ! ?
ᠪᡠᠴᡝ:ᠪᡠᠴᡝ V-TD ; ! ?
ᡫᠣᠨᡪᡞ:ᡫᠣᠨᡪᡞ V-TD ; ! ?
ᠰᡞᡨᠠ:ᠰᡞᡨᠠ V-TD ; ! ?
ᡠᡩᠠ:ᡠᡩᠠ V-TD ; ! ?
ᡫᡠᠨᠴᡝ:ᡫᡠᠨᠴᡝ V-TD ; ! ?
ᡫᡝᡣᠰᡞ:ᡫᡝᡣᠰᡞ V-TD ; ! ?

LEXICON Punctuation

᠈%<cm%>:᠈ # ; ! ","
᠉%<sent%>:᠉ # ; ! "."
